Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB593.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 7305(a) and (c), 7307 and 7309(a) and (b) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:SECTION 1. SECTION 7305(A) AND (C) OF TITLE 75 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES ARE AMENDED AND THE SECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING SUBSECTIONS TO READ:§ 7305. Notice to owner and lienholders of abandoned vehicles.(a) General rule.--The department upon receipt of an abandoned vehicle information report shall, within 10 business days, notify by certified mail, return receipt requested, the last known registered owner of the vehicle and all lienholders <--<--123456789101112131415161718 of record that the vehicle is being held as abandoned.* * *(c) Notice by publication.--If the identity of the last registered owner and of all lienholders cannot be determined with reasonable certainty, the contents of the notice set forth in subsection (b) shall be published one time in one newspaper of general circulation in the area where the vehicle was abandoned[.] within 10 business days of the date that the department determines a registered owner and lienholders cannot be determined with reasonable certainty. The notice may contain multiple listings of abandoned vehicles. Notice by publication locally shall be the responsibility of the salvor. The notice shall have the same effect as notice sent by certified mail.(D) ADDITIONAL NOTICE.--IN ADDITION TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (C), A SALVOR MAY PUBLISH AN ELECTRONIC COPY OF THE NOTICE UNDER SUBSECTION (C) ON THE PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE OF THE NEWSPAPER UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OR ANY OTHER PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE THAT HAS THE PRIMARY PURPOSE OF POSTING ADVERTISEMENTS OR NOTICES.(E) FAILURE TO PUBLISH.--IF WRITTEN NOTICE IS NOT TIMELY PUBLISHED IN A NEWSPAPER UNDER SUBSECTION (C), NOTICE UNDER SUBSECTION (D) SHALL BE VALID ON THE DATE OF PUBLICATION UNDER SUBSECTION (D), IF ANY. NOTICE UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL SATISFY THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (C).SECTION 2. SECTIONS 7307 AND 7309(A) AND (B) OF TITLE 75 ARE AMENDED TO READ:§ 7307. Authorization for disposal of unclaimed vehicles.The department shall, after the expiration of 30 days from the date of notice sent by certified mail to the registered owner and all lienholders of record or 30 days after publication 20250HB0593PN2028 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of notice, where applicable, and upon receipt of a written statement from the holder of the vehicle that the abandoned vehicle has not been reclaimed by the owner or lienholder within the 30-day period, authorize the disposal of the abandoned vehicle in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. The department shall process the authorization for the disposal of the abandoned vehicle within 10 business days of receipt of the written statement from the holder of the vehicle.§ 7309. Processing of nonrepairable or salvage vehicles.(a) Application for certificate of salvage.--If an abandoned vehicle is a salvage or nonrepairable vehicle as deemed by a police officer and salvor, the salvor and the police officer shall note that fact in the report to the department required in section 7304 (relating to reports to department of possession of abandoned vehicles) and shall apply for issuance of a certificate of salvage or nonrepairable vehicle as provided for in Subchapter D of Chapter 11 (relating to salvage vehicles, theft vehicles, reconstructed vehicles and flood vehicles). The application shall be approved or denied by the department within 10 business days of receipt of the application if the requirements of sections 7305 (relating to notice to owner and lienholders of abandoned vehicles) and 7307 (relating to authorization for disposal of unclaimed vehicles) have been met.(b) Notice and issuance of certificate.--If the identity of the last registered owner cannot be determined with reasonable certainty and it is impossible to determine with reasonable certainty the identity and addresses of any lienholder, no notice shall be required. Under such circumstances, the department shall upon receipt of the report by the salvor pursuant to section 7304 review the report within 10 business 20250HB0593PN2028 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 days of receipt and then issue a certificate of salvage as provided in Subchapter D of Chapter 11.* * *Section 2 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0593PN2028 - 4 - <--1234